test/src/morphology/N-anikwacas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - anikwacâs - ok : # -m animate noun
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg: anikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl: anikwacâsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Loc: anikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg: anikwacâssis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl: anikwacâssisa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: otanikwacâs
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg: otanikwacâsyiw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsnân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsnân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: oniskâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl: otanikwacâsyiw

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg: otanikwacâsa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg: otanikwacâsyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsinânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsnawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâswâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl: otanikwacâswâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl: otanikwacâsyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâssis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâssis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Sg: otanikwacâssis
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iSg: otanikwacâssisiyiw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâssisinân
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâssisinaw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâssisiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3Pl: otanikwacâssisiwâw
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Sg+Px3iPl: otanikwacâssisiyiw

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Sg: nitanikwacâsisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Sg: kitanikwacâsisak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Sg: otanikwacâsisa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iSg: otanikwacâsisiyiwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px1Pl: nitanikwacâsisinânak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px12Pl: kitanikwacâsisnawak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px2Pl: kitanikwacâsisiwâwak
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3Pl: otanikwacâsiswâwa
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Pl+Px3iPl: otanikwacâsisyiwa

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitanikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitanikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otanikwacâsiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitanikwacâsinânihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsinâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsiwâwihk 
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otanikwacâsiyihk

     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px1Sg+Loc: nitanikwacâsisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px2Sg+Loc: kitanikwacâsisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px3Sg+Loc: otanikwacâsisihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px3iSg+Loc: otanikwacâsisiyihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px1Pl+Loc: nitanikwacâsisinânihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px12Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsisinâhk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px2Pl+Loc: kitanikwacâsisiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px3Pl+Loc: otanikwacâsisiwâwihk
     anikwacâs+N+AN+Dim+Px3iPl+Loc: otanikwacâsisiyihk
